Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.131

Out-of-state licensees—Requirements in lieu of licensing.

(1) Persons with licenses deemed equivalent to licenses held by Washington licensees, as determined by the director, for a fee, commission, or other valuable consideration, or in the expectation, or upon the promise of receiving or collecting a fee, commission, or other valuable consideration, may perform those acts that require a license under this chapter, with respect to commercial real estate, provided that the out-of-state licensee, as approved by the director, does all of the following:

(a) Works in cooperation with a Washington real estate designated broker who holds a valid, active managing broker license issued under this chapter;

(b) Enters into a written agreement with the Washington firm, through its designated broker, that includes the terms of cooperation, oversight by the Washington designated broker, compensation, and a statement that the approved out-of-state licensee and its agents will agree to adhere to the laws of Washington;

(c) Furnishes the Washington designated broker with a copy of the out-of-state approved licensee's current license in good standing from any jurisdiction where the out-of-state approved licensee maintains an active real estate license;

(d) Consents to jurisdiction that legal actions arising out of the conduct of the approved out-of-state licensee or its agents may be commenced against the approved licensee in the court of proper jurisdiction of any county in Washington where the cause of action arises or where the plaintiff resides;

(e) Includes the name of the Washington broker, managing broker, or firm on all advertising in accordance with RCW 18.85.361(8); and

(f) Deposits all documentation required by this section and records and documents related to the transaction with the Washington broker, managing broker, or firm for a period of three years after the date the documentation is provided, or the transaction occurred, as appropriate.

(2) A person licensed in a jurisdiction where there is no legal distinction between a real estate broker license and a real estate salesperson license must meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this section before engaging in any activity described in this section that requires a real estate broker license in this state.

[ 2008 c 23 s 47; 2003 c 201 s 2. Formerly RCW 18.85.560.]